Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1202
Legislative intent; act; how construed.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act to (1) effectuate the delivery of quality emergency medical care in the state, (2) provide for the appropriate licensure of persons providing emergency medical care and licensure of organizations providing emergency medical services, (3) provide for the establishment of educational requirements and permitted practices for persons providing emergency medical care, (4) provide a system for regulation of emergency medical care which encourages emergency care providers and emergency medical services to provide the highest degree of care which they are capable of providing, and (5) provide a flexible system for the regulation of emergency care providers and emergency medical services that protects public health and safety.

The act shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of, carry out the intent of, and discharge the responsibilities prescribed in the act.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5173;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 486;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 12.